Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 4. Radio-Television Interference

§ 2091.
Complaint.

Upon complaint to the legislative body that some person, firm, or corporation, having authority to transact business in this State, is unreasonably and unnecessarily disturbing or interfering with the reception of radio or television waves used for radio or television transmission, the legislative body, after notice to such person, firm, or corporation, may investigate or cause to be investigated such complaint under such rules and regulations as the legislative body may prescribe as to service of such notice and as to the date of hearing thereon.

§ 2092.
Investigation; notice.

If, upon such investigation, the source and cause of such alleged disturbance or interference is determined, after due notice as provided in section 2091 of this title, the legislative body shall give due notice in writing to the person, firm, or corporation found by such legislative body to be responsible therefor to correct or eliminate the cause of such unnecessary or unreasonable disturbance or interference, within a reasonable time thereafter to be stated in such notice.
Such notice may be sent to the person, firm, or corporation affected, by registered mail addressed to the residence or place of business in this State.

§ 2093.
Penalty.

Within the time fixed in the notice, a person who refuses and neglects to correct or eliminate the cause of the unreasonable disturbance, provided the same is reasonably subject to correction at a cost not to exceed $50.00, and who, after such time, knowingly, willfully, or maliciously continues unreasonably or unnecessarily to disturb the reception of such radio or television waves, shall be fined not more than $50.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 81, eff. April 9, 1974.